California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 On each required visit, the child protective agency or its designee foster family agency shall inquire of the caregiver whether there is any new information that should be added to the child’s summary as described in subdivision (a). The child protective agency shall update the summary with the information as appropriate, but not later than the next court date or within 48 hours of a change in placement. The child protective agency or its designee foster family agency shall take all necessary steps to assist the caregiver in obtaining relevant health and education information for the child’s health and education summary as described in subdivision (a). These steps shall include, but are not limited to, obtaining educational information to share with caregivers, providing appropriate notation on documentation caregivers receive that confirms their status as approved caregivers and their
 right to access information, and explaining caregiver rights and responsibilities with regard to accessing educational information under Sections 49069.3 and 56055 of the Education Code. The caregiver of a nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, is not responsible for obtaining and maintaining the nonminor dependent’s health and educational information, but may assist the nonminor dependent with any recordkeeping that the nonminor requests of the caregiver.

(f) At the initial hearing, the court shall direct each parent to provide to the child protective agency complete medical, dental, mental health, and educational information, and medical background, of the child and of the child’s mother and the child’s biological father if known. The Judicial Council shall create a form for the purpose of obtaining health
 and education information from the child’s parents or guardians at the initial hearing. The court shall determine at the hearing held pursuant to Section 358 whether the medical, dental, mental health, and educational information has been provided to the child protective agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 829, Sec. 9.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.2.

(a) The department, in consultation with pediatricians, other health care experts, including public health nurses, and experts in and recipients of child welfare services, including parents, shall develop a plan for the ongoing oversight and coordination of health care services for a child in a foster care placement. The plan shall ensure a coordinated strategy to identify and respond to the health care needs of foster children, including mental health and dental needs, consistent with Section 205 of the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351).

(b) (1) The right of minors and nonminors in foster care
 to health care and mental health care described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16001.9 includes covered gender affirming health care and gender affirming mental health care. This right is subject to existing laws governing consent to health care for minors and nonminors and does not limit, add, or otherwise affect applicable laws governing consent to health care.

(2) The department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and other stakeholders, develop guidance and describe best practices to identify, coordinate, and support foster youth seeking access to gender affirming health care and gender affirming mental health
 care and shall incorporate current guidance on ensuring access to Medi-Cal services for transgender beneficiaries. This consultation may be incorporated into existing departmental workgroups focused on foster youth rights or on foster youth sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression. The department shall issue written guidance by January 1, 2020.

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Gender affirming health care” means medically necessary health care that respects the gender identity of the patient, as experienced and defined by the patient, and may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Interventions to suppress the development of endogenous secondary
 sex characteristics.

(ii) Interventions to align the patient’s appearance or physical body with the patient’s gender identity.

(iii) Interventions to alleviate symptoms of clinically significant distress resulting from gender dysphoria, as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 5th Edition.

(B) “Gender affirming mental health care” means mental health care or behavioral health care that respects the gender identity of the patient, as experienced and defined by the patient, and may include, but is not limited to, developmentally appropriate exploration and integration of identity, reduction of distress, adaptive coping, and strategies to increase family
 acceptance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 385, Sec. 3.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.4.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Foster parents are one of the most important sources of information about the children in their care. Courts, lawyers, and social workers should have the benefit of caregivers’ perceptions. Both federal and state law recognize the importance of foster parents’ participation in juvenile court proceedings. Federal law requires that foster parents and other caregivers receive expanded opportunities for notice, the right to participate in dependency court review and permanency hearings, and the right to communicate concerns to the courts. State law similarly provides that caregivers may submit their concerns to courts in writing.

(b) It is in the children’s best interests that their caregivers are privy to important information about them. This information is necessary to obtain social and health services for children, enroll children in school and extracurricular activities, and update social workers and court personnel about important developments affecting foster children.

(c) Most school districts and extracurricular organizations require proof of age before enrolling a child in their programs. Moreover, caregivers are required to obtain a medical appointment for their foster children within the first month of receiving the children into their homes. It would therefore be in both the children’s and the caregivers’ best interests to be provided with any available medical information, medications and
 instructions for use, and identifying information about the children upon receiving the children into their homes.

(d) Caregivers should have certain basic information in order to provide for the needs of children placed in their care, including all of the following:

(1) The name, mailing address, telephone number, facsimile number, and email address of the child’s social worker and the social worker’s supervisor.

(2) The name, mailing address, telephone number, facsimile number, and email address of the child’s attorney and court-appointed special advocate (CASA), if any.

(3) The name, address, and department number of the juvenile court in which the
 child’s juvenile court case is pending.

(4) The case number assigned to the child’s juvenile court case.

(5) A copy of the child’s birth certificate, passport, or other
 identifying documentation of age as may be required for enrollment in school and extracurricular activities.

(6) The child’s State Department of Social Services identification number.

(7) The child’s Medi-Cal identification number or group health insurance plan number.

(8) Medications or treatments in effect for the child at the time of placement, and instructions for their use.

(9) A plan outlining the child’s needs and services, including information on family and sibling visitation.

(10) A copy of the health and education summary as required under Section 16010, with the name and
 current contact information of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child.

(e) Caregivers should have knowledge of all of the following:

(1) Their right to receive notice of all review and permanency hearings concerning the child during the placement.

(2) Their right to attend those hearings or submit information they deem relevant to the court in writing.

(3) The “Caregiver Information Form” (Judicial Council Form JV-290), which allows the caregiver to provide information directly to the court.

(4) Information about and referrals to any existing
 services,
 including transportation, translation, training, forms, and other available services.

(5) The caregiver’s obligation to cooperate with any reunification, concurrent, or permanent planning for the child.

(6) Any known siblings or half-siblings of the child, whether the child has, expects, or desires to have contact or visitation with any or all siblings, and how and when caregivers facilitate the contact or visitation.

(7) The importance of the caregiver’s role in education, educational protections specific to foster youth under state and federal law, and the rights and obligations of caregivers to access and maintain educational and health information, including the requirements under Sections 49069.3,
 49076, and 56055 of the Education Code and Section 16010 of this code.

(f) Courts should know, at the earliest possible date, the interest of the caretaker in providing legal permanency for the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 829, Sec. 10.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.5.

(a) When initially placing a child into foster care or kinship care, and within 48 hours of any subsequent placement of that child, the placing agency shall provide to the child’s caretaker both of the following:

(1) Prescribed medications for the child that are in the possession of the placing agency, with instructions for the use of the medication.

(2) Information regarding any treatments that are known to the placing agency and that are in effect for the child at the time of the placement.

(b) As soon as possible after placing a child into foster care or kinship care, and no later than 30 days after placing the child, the placing agency shall provide to the child’s caregiver any available documentation or proof of the child’s age that may be required for enrollment in school or activities that require proof of age.

(c) Within 30 days of receiving a copy of a child’s birth certificate or passport, a placing agency shall provide a copy of that document to the child’s caregiver.

(d) Nothing shall preclude the placing agency from providing the name, mailing address, telephone number, and facsimile number of the child’s attorney and the child’s court-appointed special advocate, if any, to the child or the child’s caregiver upon their request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 812, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.6.

(a) As soon as a placing agency makes a decision with respect to a placement or a change in placement of a dependent child, but not later than the close of the following business day, the placing agency shall notify the child’s attorney and provide to the child’s attorney information regarding the child’s address, telephone number, and caregiver.

(b) (1) A placing agency shall not make a placement or a change in placement of a child outside the United States before a judicial finding that the placement is in the best interest of the child, except as required by federal law or treaty.

(2) The placing
 agency shall carry the burden of proof and show, by clear and convincing evidence, that placement outside the United States is in the best interest of the child.

(3) In determining the best interest of the child, the court shall consider, but not be limited to, the following factors:

(A) Placement with a relative.

(B) Placement of siblings in the same home.

(C) Amount and nature of any contact between the child and the potential guardian or caretaker.

(D) Physical and medical needs of the dependent child.

(E) Psychological and emotional needs of
 the dependent child.

(F) Social, cultural, and educational needs of the dependent
 child.

(G) Specific desires of a dependent child who is 12 years of age or older.

(4) If the court finds that a placement outside the United States is, by clear and convincing evidence, in the best interest of the child, the court may issue an order authorizing the placing agency to make a placement outside the United States. A child subject to this subdivision shall not leave the United States before the issuance of the order described in this paragraph.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “outside the United States” shall not include the lands of a federally recognized American Indian tribe or Alaskan Natives.

(6) This section does not
 apply to the placement of a dependent child with a parent.

(c) Absent exigent circumstances, as soon as a placing agency becomes aware of the need for a change in placement of a dependent child or ward that will result in the separation of siblings currently placed together, the placing agency shall notify the child’s attorney and the child’s siblings’ attorney of this proposed separation no less than 10 calendar days before the planned change of placement so that the attorneys may investigate the circumstances of the proposed separation. If the placing agency first becomes aware, by written notification from a foster family agency, group home, or other foster care provider, of the need for a change in placement for a dependent child or ward that will result in the separation of siblings currently placed together, and that the child or
 children shall be removed within seven days, notice shall be provided to the attorneys by the end of the next business day after the receipt of notice from the provider. In an emergency, the placing agency shall provide notice as soon as possible, but no later than the close of the first business day following the change of placement. This notification shall be sufficient notice for the purposes of subdivision (a).

(d) When the required notice is given before a change in placement, the notice shall include information regarding the child’s address, telephone number, and caregiver or any one or more of these items of information to the extent that this information is known at the time that the placing agency provides notice to the child’s attorney. When the required notice is given after the change in placement, notice shall include
 information regarding the child’s address, telephone number, and caregiver.

(e) The Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court directing the attorney for a child for whom a dependency petition has been filed, upon receipt from the agency responsible for placing the child of the name, address, and telephone number of the child’s caregiver, to timely provide the attorney’s contact information to the caregiver and, if the child is 10 years of age or older, to the child. This rule does not preclude an attorney from giving contact information to a child who is younger than 10 years of age.

(f) When the placing agency becomes aware that a dependent child or a nonminor dependent is an undocumented immigrant, the placing agency shall notify the dependent child’s or nonminor dependent’s
 attorney that the dependent child or nonminor dependent is an undocumented immigrant. Electronic or telephonic notice shall be provided to the attorney within five business days of learning of the dependent child’s or nonminor dependent’s immigration status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 528, Sec. 4.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to prevent children or youth in foster care placement from experiencing unnecessary or abrupt foster care placement changes that negatively impact their well-being or sense of security. It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve and strengthen the foster care placement of a child or youth whenever possible. It is also the intent of the Legislature to ensure that foster care placement changes do not occur due to gender, gender identity, race, or cultural differences. The Legislature finds and declares that unnecessary or abrupt foster care placement changes undermine the essential duties that foster caregivers have an obligation to uphold. It is the intent of the Legislature that prior to a caregiver or provider requesting a child or youth to be removed from the caregiver’s or
 provider’s care, the caregiver or provider shall participate in a placement preservation strategy meeting.

(b) Prior to making a change in the foster care placement of a child or youth, a social worker or probation officer shall develop with the caregiver a placement preservation strategy, which shall be done in consultation with the child and family team pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, to preserve the child’s or youth’s foster care placement. The strategy may include, but is not limited to, conflict resolution practices and facilitated meetings, and shall include a referral by the social worker or probation officer to the qualified individual for an assessment, as described in subdivision (g) of Section 4096, if the next placement is anticipated to be in a short-term residential therapeutic program or in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined by paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code.

(c) A social worker or probation officer shall include the strategy developed and implemented pursuant to subdivision (b) within the child’s contact notes or equivalent in the statewide child welfare information system.

(d) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Child and family team” has the same meaning as defined in Section 16501.

(2) “Conflict resolution practices” means a process designed to begin a dialogue to address conflict or concerns and identify agreements or solutions, which may be incorporated as part of a meeting of a child and family team.

(3) “Facilitated meeting” means a facilitated
 process designed to acknowledge, address, and respond to the underlying needs of all parties, that may include, but is not limited to, a meeting of a child and family team.

(4) “Representative for a child under 10 years of age” means the attorney or another individual as authorized by the child’s attorney.

(e) If, after implementing the placement preservation strategy developed pursuant to subdivision (b), the social worker or probation officer receives a placement change request from the caregiver or provider, or otherwise finds that a foster care placement change is necessary, the social worker, probation officer, or placement agency shall serve written notice on all of the following parties at least 14 calendar days prior to the change:

(1) The child’s parent or guardian.

(2) The child’s caregiver.

(3) The child’s attorney.

(4) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older.

(f) If the child’s placement cannot be preserved, the social worker shall ensure that there is appropriate placement transition planning, consistent with the county placement transition planning policy, as developed pursuant to Section 16010.11. 

(g) An unplanned foster care placement change shall not take place between 9 p.m. and 7 a.m., except by the mutual agreement of all of the following persons:

(1) The child, if the child is 10 years of age or older, or the representative of the child, if the child is under 10 years
 of age.

(2) The child’s current caregiver.

(3) The child’s prospective caregiver.

(4) The child’s social worker or probation officer.

(h) If a complaint is made to the Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson alleging that a placement change occurred in violation of this section, and that complaint is investigated pursuant to Section 16164, the office shall provide the findings of the investigation to, as applicable, the county child welfare director, or the director’s designee, or to the chief probation officer, or the chief probation officer’s designee, for the purposes of training, technical assistance, and quality improvement.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (e), a social
 worker or probation officer may change a child’s foster care placement without fulfilling the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (e) in either of the following circumstances:

(1) If it is determined that remaining in the existing foster care placement or providing prior written notice of that foster care placement change poses an imminent risk to the health or safety of the child, youth, other children, or others in the home or facility.

(2) If either the child and family team and the child, if the child is 10 years of age or older, or the child and family team and the representative of that child, if the child is less than 10 years of age, unanimously agree to waive the requirements described in subdivisions (b) and (e).

(j) This section applies to children and youth for whom the juvenile court has entered a
 judgment pursuant to Section 360 or 727. This section does not apply to a change in placement pursuant to Section 777 or due to a hospitalization.

(k) This section does not apply to a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is placed in a Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor dependents, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code, or a supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400.

(l) This section does not apply to a planned placement change as informed by the child and family team or that is as described in the child’s case plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 564, Sec. 3.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.8.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no child or youth in foster care reside in group care for longer than one year. The State Department of Social Services shall provide updates to the Legislature, commencing no later than January 1, 2014, regarding the outcomes of assessments of children and youth who have been in group homes for longer than one year and the corresponding outcomes of transitions, or plans to transition, them into family settings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 21, Sec. 41.   (AB 74)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.9.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to restrict the use of out-of-state residential facilities, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, by county placing agencies to instances in which all in-state placements and services that meet the needs of the child have been exhausted and an individualized assessment of the needs of the child, minor, or nonminor dependent in relation to an identified out-of-state residential facility has been conducted by the county before the request for child-specific certification of the out-of-state residential facility by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) Placement in an out-of-state residential facility shall occur only after the facility has been certified pursuant to
 Section 7911.1 of the Family Code, unless the placement is exempt from certification. The department shall issue instructions to the counties that describes the process the county placing agency shall follow to determine that in-state placements and services have been exhausted and the required components of an individualized assessment.

(c) On and after July 1, 2021, before seeking a child-specific certification of an out-of-state residential facility, the county placing agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Participate in a state-level technical assistance process established by the State Department of Social Services, that includes both of the following:

(A) A review of statewide placement options.

(B) Documentation of the good faith effort on
 the part of the county placing agency to implement any recommendations from a qualified individual that may avoid the need for placement out of state.

(2) Secure documentation of a recommendation by a county multidisciplinary team that includes verification by the county that the program provides the specific clinical services and qualifications which the individual child needs and that these services are unavailable in-state.

(A) The multidisciplinary team shall consist of participating members from county social services, county mental health, county probation, county superintendents of schools, and other members, as determined by the county. The interagency placement committee may serve as the multidisciplinary team for the purpose of this section.

(B) Participants shall have knowledge or experience in the
 prevention, identification, and treatment of child abuse and neglect cases, and shall be qualified to recommend a broad range of services related to child abuse or neglect.

(d) On and after October 1, 2021, in addition to meeting the requirements of subdivision (c), the county placing agency shall obtain an assessment of the child’s services and placement needs, incorporating the recommendations of a qualified individual, as described in subdivision (g) of Section 4096.

(e) If placement of a child in an out-of-state residential facility is recommended by the county placing agency following the activities described in subdivisions (c) and (d), the placing agency may request a child-specific certification of the placement pursuant to Section 7911.1 of the Family Code by submitting to the State Department of Social Services documentation that the county placing agency has completed
 the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d). The request shall be signed and approved by the deputy director or director of the county child welfare agency or the chief probation officer of the county probation department, as applicable.

(f) Upon receiving verification that the State Department of Social Services has certified the child-specific out-of-state residential facility, the county placing agency shall seek court approval of placement in the out-of-state residential facility pursuant to Section 361.21 or 727.1, as applicable, before placing the child in the out-of-state residential facility. The county placing agency shall present to the court evidence that it has completed all the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) and proof that the facility has been certified by the department pursuant to Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(g) Subdivisions (c) to (e),
 inclusive, do not apply to the placement of a child in an out-of-state residential facility that is exempt from certification pursuant to Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(h) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 46.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.10.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the admission of dependents, nonminor dependents, and wards of the juvenile courts in psychiatric residential treatment facilities, as defined by Section 1250.10 of the Health and Safety Code, occur only when medically necessary and only as the least restrictive setting for psychiatric services. It is further the intent of the Legislature that county child welfare agencies and probation departments maintain communication with any dependent’s, nonminor dependent’s, or ward’s treatment team in a psychiatric residential treatment facility in order to ensure the dependent, nonminor dependent, or ward is receiving all necessary services while in the facility and is placed in a less restrictive facility at the earliest possible time. Further, the child
 welfare agency or probation department shall be engaged with the treatment team in order to effectively implement the aftercare plan developed pursuant to Section 1262 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Prior to any voluntary admission of a minor dependent or ward into a psychiatric residential treatment facility, the child welfare agency or probation department shall obtain authorization from the juvenile court, pursuant to Section 6552, for admission to the facility in the manner described by Section 361.23 or 727.13, as applicable.

(c) For a dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, the county child welfare agency or probation department, as applicable, shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain regular and consistent communication with the dependent’s,
 ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s treatment team in order to ensure the dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent is receiving necessary services and to report on the dependent’s, ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s progress to the court.

(2) Develop a plan detailing all of the following:

(A) How the county child welfare agency or probation department, as applicable, will provide access to necessary services not provided by the facility, including, but not limited to, independent living skills services, visitation consistent with court orders, and education services, while the dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent remains in the facility.

(B) How the county child welfare agency or probation department, as applicable, will plan for the dependent’s, ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s placement and services upon discharge from the
 facility, including any community-based mental health services.

(C) How the county child welfare agency or probation department, as applicable, in consultation with the dependent’s, ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s treatment team, will support the dependent’s, ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s lifelong connections.

(3) Modify the plan described in paragraph (2) to implement the aftercare plan developed pursuant to Section 1262 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Provide a copy of the plan developed pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) to the court for hearings described in Section 361.23 or 727.13, as applicable.

(d) The plans developed pursuant to subparagraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c) shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A description of how the child and family team and system of care partners are involved in the implementation of the dependent’s, nonminor dependent’s, or ward’s aftercare plan.

(2) How the county child welfare agency or probation department will seek or develop less restrictive placement options for the dependent, nonminor dependent, or ward, preferably with family or in family-based settings.

(3) Whether and how the county child welfare agency or probation department has engaged or will engage in a state level technical assistance process developed by the State Department of Social Services to identify placement and services resources for the dependent or ward.

(4) How the county child welfare agency or probation department will comply with the
 requirements of Section 4096 if the plan for providing aftercare includes transition to a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment placement.

(e) Whenever a county child welfare agency or probation department is notified by a psychiatric residential treatment facility that the consent for voluntary admission has been revoked, the county child welfare agency or probation department shall make immediate arrangements for the dependent’s, ward’s or nonminor dependent’s discharge from the facility. The county child welfare agency or probation department shall have staff available to arrange for the discharge of a dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent if consent is revoked during nonbusiness hours. The child welfare agency or probation department shall ensure that discharge from the facility shall be in accordance with the nonminor dependent’s aftercare plan which shall be implemented to ensure continuity of care with the
 nonminor dependent’s family, school, and community upon discharge.

(f) Whenever a dependent, ward, or nonminor is detained involuntarily in a psychiatric residential treatment facility pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150), or admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility by consent of a conservator, the county child welfare agency or probation department shall regularly monitor the dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent. The county child welfare agency or county probation department shall work with the facility to ensure that the dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent is discharged with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition into a less restrictive setting. The county child welfare agency or county probation department shall provide evidence of these activities to the juvenile court at hearings pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 361.23 or subdivision (g) of Section 727.13, as
 applicable.

(g) The social worker or probation officer responsible for the dependent, ward, or nonminor dependent shall request from the psychiatric residential treatment facility information about the dependent’s, ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s anticipated length of stay, service and treatment needs, and a copy of the dependent’s, ward’s, or nonminor dependent’s aftercare plan, developed pursuant to Section 1262 of the Health and Safety Code, when available.

(h) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the
 department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 589, Sec. 16.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.11.

(a) (1) Each county child welfare agency shall adopt a policy for supporting foster children who are transitioning between placement settings and who are transitioning from foster care to reunification. The placement transition planning policy shall include both of the following components:

(A) Ensure that foster children are provided the opportunity to provide input on their placement transition, as developmentally and age appropriate and ensure that the child’s current or most recent caregiver also has input into the transition needs of the child.

(B) Provide guidance to social workers for obtaining input and sharing information in placement transition
 planning and incorporating the planning into case plans in such a way as to support the strengths and needs of children and to reduce trauma and any psychological, cultural, developmental, relational, spiritual, or emotional harm to the foster child.

(2) In developing the placement transition policy, the county child welfare agency shall consult with foster youth, caregivers, and tribes to create a placement transition policy that includes all of the following:

(A) Consideration of a child’s educational, medical, mental health, religious or faith-based, cultural, dietary, extracurricular and social, and developmental needs.

(B) How to maintain permanent connections for the child, including supporting relationships with relatives, friends, and in the case of an Indian child, extended family members and the child’s
 tribe, and other individuals who are important to the child, and continuity in health care, education, child daycare, extracurricular and social activities, and other community involvement.

(C) How transitions will be managed, including timing, preparation for the move, such as visits or contact with the current and new care providers, ensuring the child has all of their possessions, how the child will be transported to the new placement, and how the child can participate in scheduled upcoming events and activities.

(D) How the social worker will ensure that the transition plan is carried out as designed and how any necessary adjustments will occur and be communicated.

(E) The designation of an individual who will communicate with the child, and in the case of an Indian child, the child’s tribe, throughout the
 transition process to ensure the child understands what is happening and who is involved in decisionmaking.

(b) (1) The department, in consultation with counties that have implemented placement transition planning and with other stakeholders who have placement transition planning expertise, shall issue guidance to county child welfare agencies to describe best practices and strategies for successful placement transition planning.

(2) A county child welfare agency shall submit to the department its placement transition planning policy, via email or other correspondence, no later than one year after the department has issued its guidance and provided funding to counties to develop their placement transition planning policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16011.

(a) Subject to the conditions prescribed by this section, Los Angeles County may pursue the development and evaluation of a pilot Internet-based health and education passport system. The system shall be known as the Passport System. The Passport System shall collect and maintain health and education records for foster children under the supervision of the county social services or probation department, as required by Section 16010. The Passport System shall initially be conducted as a limited pilot project in a subset of Los Angeles County, and upon successful evaluation, may be expanded statewide.

(1) Los Angeles County shall be responsible for the planning, development, and implementation of the Passport System. Los Angeles County is responsible for the development of the advance planning document (APD) as prescribed by federal regulations, requesting funding consistent with the child welfare services program. The APD shall include, but not be limited to, the design of an interface between the web-based Passport System and the Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) so that information entered into the Passport System shall automatically and permanently reside in the CWS/CMS. In addition, the APD shall include the scope of the pilot project, the evaluation plan pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (d), and the county shall address a plan for compliance with pertinent provisions in state and federal law requiring that privacy of confidential information be maintained.
